Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-214 Rules and regulations. The
commissioner may make such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the
execution of the functions vested in the commissioner by section 431:4-208 to
section 431:4-214, and may for such purpose classify domestic stock insurance
companies, securities, and other persons or matters within the commissioner's
jurisdiction. No provision of section 431:4-208 to section 431:4-210 imposing
any liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity
with any rule or regulation of the commissioner, notwithstanding that such rule
or regulation may, after such act or omission, be amended or rescinded or
determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next